Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-919
Act; exclusive means of judicial review.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the Administrative Procedure Act establishes the exclusive means of judicial review of a final decision of any agency in a contested case.

Laws 1963, c. 531, § 3, p. 1666;

Laws 1987, LB 253, § 21;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 187.